Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-703
Reserves, refuges, and sanctuaries; signs; form; where placed; defacing prohibited; penalty.

At each section corner and in full sight of the traveled highway at each game reserve, bird refuge, or wild fowl sanctuary, there shall be placed by the commission a conspicuous, permanent sign as follows:

State of NebraskaGame and Bird SanctuaryHunting or Molesting Game or Bird LifeProhibited and PunishedNebraska Game and Parks Commissionor with such other notice as the commission may deem advisable.Anyone removing or defacing any such sign shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 112, IV, § 3, p. 421;

C.S.1929, § 37-403;

R.S.1943, § 37-403;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-403;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 317.